Wyoming statutes. Title 5 Courts
Chapter 2 Supreme Court

Cross references. —

For duty of supreme court to adopt suitable rules and regulations to provide for division of work between district judges, see
§

5-3-102

.

As to election of justices of the supreme court at the general election and as to term of office, see
§

22-2-105

.